Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
SUBPOENAS

16-9-101. Right to compel attendance of witnesses.

In every criminal case, the prosecuting attorney and the defendant have the right to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of tangible evidence by service upon them of a subpoena to appear for examination as a witness at any proceeding before the court. Service of a subpoena upon a parent or legal guardian who has physical care of an unemancipated minor that contains wording commanding said parent or legal guardian to produce the unemancipated minor for the purpose of testifying before the court shall be valid service compelling the attendance of both said parent or legal guardian and the unemancipated minor for examination as witnesses. In addition, service of a subpoena as described in this subsection (1) shall compel said parent or legal guardian either to make all necessary arrangements to ensure that the unemancipated minor is available before the court to testify or to appear in court and show good cause for the unemancipated minor's failure to appear.

The issuance and service of subpoenas and all procedures related thereto shall be in conformity with and as required by applicable rule of criminal procedure adopted by the Colorado supreme court.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 233, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-9-101.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 946, § 1, effective May 27.